Utah statutes.
77-7-4.   Magistrate may orally order arrest.
A magistrate may orally require a peace officer to arrest anyone committing or
attempting to commit a public offense in the presence of the magistrate, and,
in the case of an emergency, when probable cause exists, a magistrate may
orally authorize a peace officer to arrest a person for a public offense, and
thereafter, as soon as practical, an information shall be filed against the
person arrested.
